Florida, session 2026, HB479.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 373.027, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
373.027 Water management preemption.—
(1) A county or municipality may not adopt laws,
regulations, rules, or policies relating to any of the
following:
(a) Water quality.
(b) Water quantity.
(c) Pollution control.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb479-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 479 2026
(d) Pollutant discharge prevention or removal.
(e) Wetlands, including any delineation.
(2) The regulation of water quality, water quantity,
pollution control, pollutant discharge prevention and removal,
and wetlands, including any delineation, is exclusively
preempted to the state.
(3) This section does not:
(a) Apply to an interagency or interlocal agreement
between the department and any agency, water management
district, or local government conducting programs relating to or
materially affecting the water resources of the state.
(b) Affect the authority of a county or municipality to
regulate and operate its own water system, wastewater system, or
stormwater system.
(4) If the department determines that a county or
municipality is in violation of this section, the department
shall notify the Chief Financial Officer of the violation and
the Chief Financial Officer shall withhold any state funds to
which the county or municipality may be entitled.
Section 2. Section 373.591, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb479-00